New Jersey, session 222, A3271.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A school district that intends to host a college or career fair for high school students shall notify each registered apprenticeship program offered in the county in which the school district is located of the college or career fair.  The notification shall include: a. the planned date, time, and location of the college or career fair; and b. information on how an apprenticeship program may register with the school district to participate in the college or career fair. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.